Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 310, O.S.L.


2025 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-126.2), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 6-126.2. A. An operator of a commercial motor vehicle


within this state shall be able to demonstrate proficiency of the


English language sufficient to:


1. Converse with the general public;


2. Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English


language;


3. Respond to official inquiries; and


4. Make entries on reports and records.

Req. No. 2496 Page 1


B. 1. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to be


in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine in the


amount of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) for each violation.


The proceeds of any penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph


shall be deposited in the Weigh Station Improvement Revolving Fund


created in Section 1167 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. A driver found to be in violation of this section shall be


prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this


state until such a time that the driver is able to meet the


identification English language proficiency provisions of this


section. Any driver found to be operating a motor vehicle within


this state while under such prohibition shall be guilty of a


misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to


exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not


more than ninety (90) days, or both such fine and imprisonment. Any


fine collected pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph shall be


deposited to the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in


Section 1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the


location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation,


and, upon payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver


who meets all requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle


within this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the


commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine or

Req. No. 2496 Page 2


present such driver within twelve (12) hours after notification, the


owner of any cargo being transported by the commercial motor vehicle


shall be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the


cargo to another vehicle. Neither the state nor the owner of such


cargo shall be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such


cargo.


C. Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle found to be in


violation of this section shall, in addition to the provisions


provided for in subsection B of this section, be subject to a


penalty of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). Any fine collected


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited to


the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-


2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2496 MSBB 12/9/2025 11:58:53 AM

















Req. No. 2496 Page 3